Utah statutes.
77-27-5.1.   Board authority to order expungement.

(1)  Upon granting a pardon for one or more convictions, the board shall issue an expungement order, directing any criminal justice agency to remove the recipient's identifying information relating to the expunged convictions from its records.

(2)  An expungement order, issued by the board, has the same legal effect and authority as an order of expungement issued by a court, pursuant to Title 77, Chapter 40, Utah Expungement Act.

(3)  The board shall provide clear written directions to the recipient along with a list of agencies known to be affected by the expungement order.



Enacted by Chapter 41, 2013 General Session

